Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.380

Wind and solar resource evaluation equipment.

A county may not prohibit the installation of wind and solar resource evaluation equipment necessary for the design and environmental planning of a renewable energy project.

[ 2023 c 230 s 305.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 230: See note following RCW 43.394.010.